Utah statutes.
31A-22-425.   Rulemaking authority for standards related to life insurance
and annuities.
In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act,
the commissioner may make rules to establish standards for any of the
following:
(1)  if used in connection with the solicitation or sale of life insurance
policies and contracts:
(a)  a buyer's guide;
(b)  a disclosure;
(c)  an illustration;
(d)  a policy summary; or
(e)  a recommendation; and
(2)  in a life insurance policy, annuity contract, or life insurance or
annuity certificate:
(a)  a definition of a term;
(b)  a disclosure;
(c)  an exclusion; or
(d)  a limitation.
